Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.180

License—Time limitations as to issuance and use—Notification.

The county auditor may issue the marriage license at the time of application, but shall issue such license no later than the third full day following the date of the application. A marriage license issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may not be used until three days after the date of application and shall become void if the marriage is not solemnized within sixty days of the date of the issuance of the license, and the county auditor shall notify the applicant in writing of this requirement at the time of issuance of the license.

[ 1985 c 82 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 128 s 1; 1963 c 230 s 3; 1953 c 107 s 1. Prior: 1943 c 250 s 1; 1939 c 204 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8450-5.]